ja: スクレーパーの実装タイプ付き: 金属製コーム/スクレーパー; 複数の道具を含む; 道具なし; スクレーパースティック/ロッド; ワイヤーブラシ; その他
ru: Тип скребка в комплекте: Металлический гребень/скребок; Несколько инструментов в комплекте; Без инструмента; Скребок-палочка/стержень; Проволочная щетка; Другое
zh-CN: 配套刮奏工具类型: 金属梳/刮刀; 包含多种工具; 不含工具; 刮棒/刮杆; 钢丝刷; 其他
es: Tipo de implemento raspador incluido: Peine/raspador de metal; Varios implementos incluidos; No incluye implementos; Palo/varilla raspadora; Cepillo de alambre; Otro
pt-BR: Implemento de reco-reco incluído tipo: Pente/raspador de metal; Vários implementos incluídos; Nenhum implemento incluído; Bastão/haste raspadora; Escova de aço; Outro
nl: Meegeleverd schraapinstrument type: Metalen kam/schraper; Meerdere hulpmiddelen inbegrepen; Geen hulpmiddel inbegrepen; Schraperstok/staaf; Draadborstel; Overige
sk-SK: Typ priloženého prídavného škrabadla: Kovový hrebeň/škrabka; Vrátane viacerých nástrojov; Bez nástroja; Škrabacia tyčinka/prút; Drôtená kefa; Iné
fi: Mukana toimitetun raaputtimen tyyppi: Metallikampa/-kaavin; Sisältää useita työvälineitä; Ei sisällä työvälineitä; Kaavintikku/-sauva; Teräsharja; Muu
zh-TW: 隨附刮奏工具類型: 金屬梳/刮刀; 包含多種工具; 未包含工具; 刮棒/桿; 鋼絲刷; 其他
el: Τύπος περιλαμβανόμενου εξαρτήματος ξύστρας: Μεταλλική χτένα/ξύστρα; Περιλαμβάνονται πολλαπλά εργαλεία; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται κανένα εργαλείο; Ράβδος/βέργα ξύστρας; Συρματόβουρτσα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Uključena vrsta priključka za struganje: Metalni češalj/strugalica; Uključeno više alata; Alat nije uključen; Štap/šipka za struganje; Žičana četka; Ostalo
en: Included scraper implement type: Metal comb/scraper; Multiple implements included; No implement included; Scraper stick/rod; Wire brush; Other
nb: Inkludert skraperedskapstype: Metallkam/skrape; Flere redskaper inkludert; Ingen redskap inkludert; Skrapestokk/stang; Stålbørste; Annet
th: ประเภทเครื่องมือขูดที่รวมมาในชุด: หวี/ที่ขูดโลหะ; มีอุปกรณ์หลายชิ้นให้; ไม่มีอุปกรณ์ให้; ไม้/แท่งขูด; แปรงลวด; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Įtraukto grandiklio įrankio tipas: Metalinės šukos / grandiklis; Pridėti keli įrankiai; Neįtraukta jokių įrankių; Grandymo lazdelė / strypas; Vielinis šepetys; Kita
sv: Inkluderad typ av skrapredskap: Metallkam/skrapa; Flera redskap ingår; Inget redskap ingår; Skrappinne/stav; Stålborste; Övrigt
cs: Typ nářadí shrnovače: Kovový hřeben/škrabka; Včetně více nástrojů; Bez nástroje; Škrabací tyčka/proutek; Drátěný kartáč; Jiné
pl: Typ dołączonego skrobaka: Metalowy grzebień / skrobak; Wiele narzędzi w zestawie; Brak narzędzia w zestawie; Kijek / pręcik do skrobania; Szczotka druciana; Inny
fr: Type d’accessoire de jeu inclus: Peigne/grattoir en métal; Plusieurs outils inclus; Aucun outil inclus; Baguette/tige de grattage; Brosse métallique; Autre
tr: Dahil edilen kazıyıcı alet tipi: Metal tarak/kazıyıcı; Birden fazla alet dahildir; Alet dahil değildir; Kazıyıcı çubuk; Tel fırça; Diğer
de: Typ des enthaltenen Schaberwerkzeugs: Metallkamm/-schaber; Mehrere Werkzeuge enthalten; Kein Werkzeug enthalten; Schaberstab/-stange; Drahtbürste; Sonstige
ko: 포함된 스크래퍼 구현 유형: 금속 빗/스크레이퍼; 다중 도구 포함; 도구 미포함; 스크레이퍼 스틱/로드; 와이어 브러시; 기타
bg-BG: Тип включен инструмент за стържене: Метален гребен/стъргалка; Включени са множество инструменти; Не е включен инструмент; Пръчка/прът за стъргане; Телена четка; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de alfaia raspador incluído: Pente/raspador de metal; Vários instrumentos incluídos; Nenhum instrumento incluído; Vareta/bastão raspador; Escova de arame; Outro
da: Type af medfølgende skrabeværktøj: Metalkam/-skraber; Flere redskaber medfølger; Intet redskab medfølger; Skrabepind/-stok; Stålbørste; Andet
ro-RO: Tip de unelte de răzuire incluse: Pieptene/racletă din metal; Instrumente multiple incluse; Niciun instrument inclus; Bețișor/tijă pentru racletă; Perie de sârmă; Altele
hu: Mellékelt kaparóeszköz típusa: Fém fésű/kaparó; Több eszközt is tartalmaz; Nem tartalmaz eszközt; Kaparó pálca/rúd; Drótkefe; Egyéb
it: Tipo di strumento raschiatore incluso: Pettine/raschietto in metallo; Più attrezzi inclusi; Nessun attrezzo incluso; Bastoncino/bacchetta per raschiare; Spazzola in filo metallico; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta priloženega pripomočka za strganje: Kovinski glavnik/strgalo; Priloženih je več pripomočkov; Pripomočki niso priloženi; Strgalo v obliki palice; Žična krtača; Drugo
vi: Loại dụng cụ cạo đi kèm: Lược/dụng cụ cạo bằng kim loại; Kèm theo nhiều dụng cụ; Không kèm theo dụng cụ; Thanh/que cạo; Bàn chải sắt; Khác